Missouri, session 2026, HB1779.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 213, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 213.014, to read as follows:
213.014. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Defining SEX Act".
2. The following terms shall mean:
(1) "Female", an individual who has, had, will have, or would have, but for a
developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive system that at
some point produces, transports, and utilizes eggs for fertilization;
(2) "Male", an individual who has, had, will have, or would have, but for a
developmental or genetic anomaly or historical accident, the reproductive system that at
some point produces, transports, and utilizes sperm for fertilization;
(3) "Sex", an individual's biological sex, either male or female.
3. Unless context or explicit definition indicates otherwise, "gender", when used
alone, rather than with or as an adjective modifying other words, in preexisting state
law, administrative rules, or guidelines to refer to males, females, or the natural
differences between males and females, shall be considered a synonym for "sex".
4. "Gender", when used alone, rather than with or as an adjective modifying
other words, in preexisting state law, administrative rules, or guidelines to refer to
males, females, or the natural differences between males and females, shall not be
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1779 2
considered a synonym or shorthand expression for "gender identity (an internal sense of
gender)", "experienced gender", "gender expression", or "gender role".
5. "Gender identity", if used in state law, administrative rules, or guidelines,
shall not be considered a synonym or substitute for "sex" or "gender".
6. An individual born with a medically verifiable diagnosis of a disorder or
difference in sex development shall enjoy the relevant legal protections and
accommodations afforded under the federal Americans with Disabilities Act.
✔